Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1168.
do enact as follows:AB1168,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1168,28Section 2. 20.435 (1) (fr) of the statutes is created to read:AB1168,2,10920.435 (1) (fr) Medical debt abolition. The amounts in the schedule for the 10abolition of medical debt under s. 146.691.AB1168,311Section 3. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:AB1168,2,131271.05 (6) (b) 57. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, any 13amount of indebtedness of the claimant discharged under s. 146.691.AB1168,414Section 4. 146.691 of the statutes is created to read:AB1168,2,1515146.691 Medical debt abolition. (1) In this section:AB1168,2,1716(a) “Eligible resident” means an individual who is a resident of this state and 17to whom one of the following applies:AB1168,2,19181. The individual has an annual household income that does not exceed 400 19percent of the federal poverty line, as defined in 42 USC 9902 (2).AB1168,2,21202. The individual has medical debt equal to 5 percent or more of the 21individual’s annual household income.AB1168,2,2322(b) “Medical debt” means an obligation to pay money arising from the receipt 23of health care services.AB1168,3,224(2) The department shall do all of the following or contract with a nonprofit 1organization that is experienced in locating, purchasing, and abolishing medical 2debt for individuals to do all of the following:AB1168,3,33(a) Identify eligible residents.AB1168,3,64(b) Review the medical debt accounts of each commercial debt collection 5agency or health care provider willing to sell the medical debt accounts of eligible 6residents.AB1168,3,107(c) Conduct outreach with health care providers about the benefits of 8abolishing medical debt under this section. The department or nonprofit 9organization shall first conduct the outreach under this paragraph with safety-net 10hospitals, as determined by the department.AB1168,3,1611(d) Negotiate and purchase the medical debt of eligible residents from 12commercial debt collection agencies and health care providers. The department or 13nonprofit organization shall prioritize negotiating and purchasing medical debt 14under this paragraph from health care providers for which a large percentage of 15their patient population receives Medical Assistance and health care providers that 16are located in zip codes that are disproportionately affected by medical debt.AB1168,3,1917(e) Abolish the medical debt purchased under par. (d) in a manner that 18minimizes the effect of the medical debt abolition on the eligible resident’s tax 19liability.AB1168,3,2220(f) Within 60 days of abolishing an eligible resident’s medical debt, notify the 21eligible resident that they no longer owe that medical debt to the applicable 22commercial debt collection agency or health care provider.AB1168,4,223(3) The department or a nonprofit organization that contracts with the 24department under sub. (2) may not attempt to seek payment from an eligible 1resident for medical debt purchased by the department or nonprofit organization 2under sub. (2) (d).AB1168,4,63(4) Beginning on the first day of the 13th month beginning after the effective 4date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date], the department shall annually report 5to the governor and the appropriate standing committees of the legislature under s. 613.172 (3) all of the following for the previous year:AB1168,4,77(a) The dollar amount of medical debt abolished under this section.AB1168,4,98(b) The number of eligible residents whose medical debt was abolished under 9this section.AB1168,4,1210(c) The demographic characteristics, including race, ethnicity, income level, 11zip code, and insurance status, of the eligible residents whose medical debt was 12abolished under this section.AB1168,4,1513(d) The number and characteristics, including geography and payor mix, of 14health care providers from whom medical debt was purchased and abolished under 15this section.AB1168,4,1616